Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 317.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 317.2. A. The To protect the free exercise of religion


as guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United States


Constitution and Section 2 of Article I of the Oklahoma


Constitution, the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code or any building


code adopted by any political subdivision of this state, or any


rules or regulations promulgated thereto, may shall permit the


authority having jurisdiction to allow a church that is occupancy-


rated an A3 building pursuant to any codes adopted by the Oklahoma

Req. No. 3127 Page 1


Uniform Building Code Commission to utilize its building space for


temporary overnight visitors for the purpose of religious retreats,


ministry programs, overnight or lock-in events, emergency or


catastrophic occurrences, to shelter transient persons, or to


accommodate displaced persons due to hardship or inclement weather.


Such use shall constitute a protected exercise of religion and


ministry activity and no municipality, political subdivision, or


other government entity shall infringe upon, prohibit, or impose


additional restrictions that unduly burden a church’s prerogative to


engage in these activities as part of its constitutionally


guaranteed religious freedom. Such building use shall not


constitute a change in code occupancy rating, purposes, or


activities. Provided, any temporary overnight visitor space


utilized by a church within its existing buildings as authorized by


this section shall be authorized only for a limited duration, unless


the Governor has declared a state of emergency or exigent


circumstances exist. The church acting pursuant to the provisions


of this section shall not charge for its accommodations nor be


deemed not be construed to authorize any church to operate as a bed


and breakfast, hotel, or motel for any code occupancy rating


purposes or to charge fees for accommodations in a manner that


converts the use to a non-ministry commercial purpose.


B. Churches which temporarily accommodate overnight visitors as


provided in this section shall have one of the following:

Req. No. 3127 Page 2


1. An automatic sprinkler system in the area of overnight


accommodations that is monitored by a third party; or


2. A hard-wired stand-alone fire and smoke alarm in the area of


overnight accommodations in addition to an exit door or window


opening directly to a public way, exit court, or yard area.


C. Nothing in the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code or any code


adopted by any political subdivision of this state, or any rules or


regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, shall be construed to


cause a church to be in violation of the Oklahoma Uniform Building


Code or any building code adopted by a political subdivision of this


state for the sole reason the church offers temporary overnight


visitor services within the authority of this section. No


government entity shall interpret or enforce any code, rule, or


regulation in a manner that infringes on a church’s religious


exercise or ministry activity protected under this section.


D. As used in this section:


1. “Church” means a facility that is owned by a religious


organization and that is used primarily for religious services; and


2. “Religious organization” means any church, seminary,


synagogue, temple, mosque, religious order, religious corporation,


association or society, whose identity is distinctive in terms of


common religious creed, beliefs, doctrines, practices or rituals, of


any faith or denomination, including any or organization qualifying


as a church or religious organization under Section 501(c)(3) or

Req. No. 3127 Page 3


501(d) of the United States Internal Revenue Code; and of 1986, as


amended.


3. “Temporary” means no more than seventy-five (75) days in a


calendar year.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3127 CAD 1/14/2026 3:12:59 PM



































Req. No. 3127 Page 4